Maryland, session 2025, SB0329.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – State Personnel and Pensions
26–204.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *sb0329*

SENATE BILL 329
(a) (1) Except as provided in subsection (b) of this section, a member’s
contribution rate is:
(i) 4% of the member’s earnable compensation received before July
1, 2011;
(ii) 6% of the member’s earnable compensation received from July 1,
2011, to June 30, 2012, both inclusive; and
(iii) 7% of the member’s earnable compensation received on or after
July 1, 2012.
(2) Notwithstanding paragraph (1) of this subsection, [after 32 years and
6 months of service as a member,] a member does not make any further contributions
AFTER ACCRUING THE AMOUNT OF SERVICE CREDIT THAT WOULD PROVIDE THE
MAXIMUM NORMAL SERVICE RETIREMENT ALLOWANCE ALLOWED UNDER §
26–401(B) OF THIS TITLE.
26–401.
(b) (1) Except as provided in paragraphs (2), (3), and (4) of this subsection, on
retirement under this section, a member is entitled to receive a normal service retirement
allowance that equals:
(I) the number of years of the member’s creditable service ON OR
BEFORE JUNE 30, 2025, multiplied by 2% of the member’s average final compensation;
AND
(II) THE NUMBER OF YEARS OF THE MEMBER’S CREDITABLE
SERVICE ON OR AFTER JULY 1, 2025, MULTIPLIED BY 2.5% OF THE MEMBER’S
AVERAGE FINAL COMPENSATION.
(2) A member’s normal service retirement allowance under paragraph (1)
of this subsection may not exceed [65%] 70% of the member’s average final compensation.
(3) (i) This paragraph applies only to a member who is not subject to
the Law Enforcement Officers’ Modified Pension Benefit under Subtitle 2, Part II of this
title.
(ii) Except as provided in paragraph (4) of this subsection, on
retirement under this paragraph, the member is entitled to receive a normal service
retirement allowance that equals:
1. 2.3% of the member’s average final compensation
multiplied by each year of the member’s first 30 years of creditable service; and

SENATE BILL 329 3
2. 1% of the member’s average final compensation multiplied
by each year of creditable service in excess of 30 years.
(4) Subject to paragraph (2) of this subsection, on retirement under this
section, if a member’s annuity is greater than the member’s normal service retirement
allowance calculated under paragraph (1) or (3) of this subsection, the member’s normal
service retirement allowance shall equal the member’s annuity.
26–401.1.
(a) (1) In this section the following words have the meanings indicated.
(2) “DROP” means the Deferred Retirement Option Program established
under this section.
(3) “DROP member” means a member of the Law Enforcement Officers’
Pension System who:
(i) is eligible to participate in the DROP as provided in subsection
(c) of this section; and
(ii) elects to participate in the DROP as provided in subsection (e) of
this section.
(4) “EMPLOYMENT” MEANS EMPLOYMENT IN A POSITION ELIGIBLE
FOR MEMBERSHIP IN THE LAW ENFORCEMENT OFFICERS’ PENSION SYSTEM.
(b) There is a DROP for eligible members of the Law Enforcement Officers’
Pension System.
(c) (1) In this subsection, [“creditable service”] “EMPLOYMENT” does not
include credit for unused sick leave as provided in § 20–206 of this article.
(2) A member of the Law Enforcement Officers’ Pension System is eligible
to participate in the DROP if the member has at least 25 and less than 32 years of
[creditable service] EMPLOYMENT.
(d) (1) In this subsection, [“creditable service”] “EMPLOYMENT” does not
include credit for unused sick leave as provided in § 20–206 of this article.
(2) An eligible member may elect to participate in the DROP for a period
not to exceed the lesser of:
(i) 7 years;

SENATE BILL 329
(ii) the difference between 32 years and the member’s [creditable
service] EMPLOYMENT as of the date of the member’s election to participate in the DROP
and retire from the Law Enforcement Officers’ Pension System; or
(iii) a term selected by the member.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2025.